District of Columbia statutes.
19-309

Share of brother or sister or their descendants.

When the intestate leaves a brother or sister, or child or descendant of a brother or sister, and no child, descendant, or father or mother, the brother, sister, or child or descendant of a brother or sister is entitled to the whole.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 19-309.
1973 Ed., § 19-309.